Utah statutes.
31A-4-101.   Solicitation permit.
(1)  No person may advertise for or solicit or receive any funds,
subscriptions for securities, or membership fees, dues, or contributions in
Utah or from any person present in Utah for the purpose of forming or
financing the formation or enlargement of an insurer, holding company to form
or acquire one or more insurers, or any corporation or unincorporated
association to do or facilitate the doing of an insurance business in Utah or
elsewhere, unless the person has obtained the appropriate organization or
solicitation permit under Chapter 5, 6, 7, 8, or 9, and filed any required
statement under Chapter 16.
(2)  Any person obtaining the appropriate organization or solicitation permit
under this code is exempt from compliance with Title 61.
